Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.08
Veterans' Advisory Commission; members; chairperson; expenses.

The members of the Veterans' Advisory Commission shall annually appoint one of its members as chairperson and one as secretary. The members of the commission shall each qualify by taking and subscribing an oath of office. No member shall receive any salary for his or her services, but each shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred by him or her in performing his or her duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 9, p. 931;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 167;

Laws 1983, LB 369, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 100.